Hawaii statutes.
§171-18 Public land trust. All
funds derived from the sale or lease or other disposition of public lands shall
be appropriated by the laws of the State; provided that all proceeds and income
from the sale, lease, or other disposition of lands ceded to the United States
by the Republic of Hawaii under the joint resolution of annexation, approved
July 7, 1898 (30 Stat. 750), or acquired in exchange for lands so ceded, and
returned to the State of Hawaii by virtue of section 5(b) of the Act of March
18, 1959 (73 Stat. 6), and all proceeds and income from the sale, lease or
other disposition of lands retained by the United States under sections 5(c)
and 5(d) of the Act and later conveyed to the State under section 5(e) shall be
held as a public trust for the support of the public schools and other public
educational institutions, for the betterment of the conditions of native
Hawaiians as defined in the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act, 1920, as amended,
for the development of farm and home ownership on as widespread a basis as
possible, for the making of public improvements, and for the provision of lands
for public use. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-18; HRS §171-18]

Cross References

Act of March 18, 1959
is the Hawaii Admission Act, see volume 1.

Attorney General Opinions

Provides that ceded
or public trust land may be alienated. Att. Gen. Op. 95-3.

Law Journals and Reviews

Hawaii's Ceded Lands,
Comment, 3 UH L. Rev. 101.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next